Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. In General

Article is a classification of cities within meaning of state constitution

(art. 13, § 1, Wyo. Const.) State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

Cited

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. City of Rock Springs, 823 P.2d 1176,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 1 to 878.

62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 2, 12 and 35.

§ 15-3-101.
Population requirement; issuance of proclamation; receipt as evidence.

If it is ascertained that any city or town has attained a population of more than four thousand (4,000) inhabitants and that fact is certified to the governor by the mayor of the city or town, attested by its seal, the governor, by public proclamation, shall declare the city or town to be a city of the first class. The proclamation shall be published by the city for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the city. A certified copy of the proclamation shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the city is situated. The record of the proclamation shall be received as evidence of the organization and corporate existence of the city as a city of the first class in any court within the state.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 161; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-161; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Annexation. —

Adjoining landowners had standing to bring a declaratory judgment action regarding a municipal ordinance annexing certain property because, among other things, the annexation brought their land within the city's control given that the city was a city of the first class. Cox v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 146, 79 P.3d 500,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Collier v. Hilltop Nat'l Bank, 920 P.2d 1241,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-3-102.
Name; service of process.

The corporate name of each first class city is the city of
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . , and the city by that name has perpetual succession. All process whatever affecting any such city shall be served upon the mayor or acting mayor, or, in the absence of both, upon the city clerk.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 162; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-162; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-3-103.
Rights to remain in effect.

No right of property accrued to any city or town, corporation or person under any law previously in force is affected by a city or town becoming a first class city. All ordinances not in conflict with this chapter shall continue in force until amended or repealed by the governing body. Any city or town becoming a first class city retains all its trusts, rights, privileges and indebtedness. All actions commenced by or against any city or town which becomes a first class city shall be continued to final judgment and satisfaction as if its status had not changed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 163; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-163; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-3-104.
Temporary continuation of existing government.

The government of the city shall continue in authority until the reorganization, which shall be effected by the holding of a regular election under the provisions of law. The governing body may divide the city into not less than three (3) wards to take effect prior to the election.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 165; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-165; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Vacancies created by reclassification filled under section. —

Even if it were true that reclassification brought about vacancies in the city offices, this section fills the vacancies by appointment until the reorganization is completed. Marion v. Lander, 394 P.2d 910,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1964), cert. denied, 380 U.S. 925, 85 S. Ct. 929, 13 L. Ed. 2d 810, 1965 U.S. LEXIS 1878 (U.S. 1965), reh'g denied, 380 U.S. 989, 85 S. Ct. 1352, 14 L. Ed. 2d 283 (U.S. 1965).